Louisiana, session 2026, HB795.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:337.13(B) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§337.13. Collection of sales and use taxes by political subdivisions
* * *
B.(1) In each parish, every taxing authority that levies a sales and use tax in
that parish may contract and make such agreement between and among themselves
with respect to the joint collection, enforcement, and administration of the sales and
use taxes as may be deemed proper by their respective governing authorities. Such
agreement, when concluded, shall be in writing and shall include a statement of the
financial obligations of each of the parties to the agreement and may provide for the
joint use of funds, facilities, personnel, or any combination thereof deemed necessary
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-720 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 795
to accomplish the purposes of the agreement. No provision of such agreement shall
have the effect of providing for a donation, in whole or in part, of the public funds
or services of one of the parties for the benefit of the other. Such agreement may also
provide for the collection, enforcement, and administration of taxes other than sales
and use taxes which are levied by taxing authorities.
(2) In Orleans Parish, the fee charged to a taxing authority pursuant to an
agreement authorized by Paragraph (1) of this Subsection shall not exceed five
percent of tax collections.
* * *